Washington statutes.
RCW 23.95.600

Domestic entity—Definition.

For the purposes of this Article 6, the term "domestic entity" does not include a domestic limited liability partnership.

[ 2015 c 176 s 1601.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Contingent effective date—2015 c 176: See note following RCW 23.95.100.